en: Avoid release to the environment. Refer to special instructions/safety data sheets, S61
cs: Zabraňte uvolnění do životního prostředí. Viz speciální pokyny nebo bezpečnostní listy, S61
de: Freisetzung in die Umwelt vermeiden. Besondere Anweisungen einholen/Sicherheitsdatenblatt zu Rate ziehen, S61
dk: Undgå udledning til miljøet. Se særlig vejledning/leverandørbrugsanvisning, S61
el: Αποφύγετε την ελευθέρωσή του στο περιβάλλον. Αναφερθείτε σε ειδικές οδηγίες/.ελτίο δεδοµένων ασφαλείας, S61
es: Evítese su liberación al medio ambiente. Recábense instrucciones específicas de la ficha de datos de seguridad, S61
et: Vältida kemikaali sattumist keskkonda. Tutvuda erinõuetega/ ohutuskaardiga, S61
fi: Vältettävä päästämistä ympäristöön. Lue erityisohjeet/käyttöturvallisuustiedote, S61
fr: Éviter le rejet dans l'environnement. Consulter les instructions spéciales/la fiche de données de sécurité, S61
hu: Kerülni kell az anyag környezetbe jutását. Lásd a külön használati utasítást/biztonsági adatlapot, S61
it: Non disperdere nell'ambiente. Riferirsi alle istruzioni speciali/schede informative in materia di sicurezza, S61
lt: Vengti patekimo į aplinką. Naudotis specialiomis instrukcijomis (saugos duomenų lapais), S61
lv: Nepieļaut nokļūšanu vidē. Ievērot īpašos norādījumus vai izmantot drošības datu lapas, S61
mt: Titfax fl-ambjent. Irreferi għall-istruzzjonijiet speċjali/informazzjoni fuq sigurtà, S61
nl: Voorkom lozing in het milieu. Vraag om speciale instructies/veiligheidskaart, S61
no: Unngå at stoffet kommer ut i naturen. Før bruk innhentes spesielle anvisninger/sikkerhetsdatablad gjennomgås, S61
pl: Unikać zrzutów do środowiska. Postępować zgodnie z instrukcją lub kartą charakterystyki, S61
pt: Evitar a libertação para o ambiente. Obter instruções específìcas/fichas de segurança, S61
sk: Zabráňte uvol’neniu do životného prostredia. Oboznámte sa so špeciálnymi inštrukciami\, kartou bezpečnostných údajov, S61
sl: Ne izpuščati/odlagati v okolje. Upoštevati posebna navodila/ varnostni list, S61
sv: Undvik utsläpp till miljön. Läs särskilda instruktioner/varuinformationsblad, S61

en: If swallowed\, do not induce vomiting: seek medical advice immediately and show this container or label, S62
cs: Při požití nevyvolávejte zvracení: okamžitě vyhledejte lékařskou pomoc a ukažte tento obal nebo označení, S62
de: Bei Verschlucken kein Erbrechen herbeiführen. Sofort ärztlichen Rat einholen und Verpackung oder dieses Etikett vorzeigen, S62
dk: Ved indtagelse\, undgå at fremprovokere opkastning: kontakt omgående læge og vis denne beholder eller etiket, S62
el: Σε περίπτωση κατάποσης να µην προκληθεί εµετός: ζητήστε αµέσως ιατρική συµβουλή και δείξτε αυτό το δοχείο η την ετικέτα του, S62
es: En caso de ingestión no provocar el vómito: acúdase inmediatamente al médico y muéstresele la etiqueta o el envase, S62
et: Kemikaali allaneelamisel mitte esile kutsuda oksendamist\, pöörduda viivitamatult arsti poole ja näidata talle pakendit või etiketti, S62
fi: Jos kemikaalia on nielty\, ei saa oksennuttaa: hakeuduttava välittömästi lääkärin hoitoon ja näytettävä tämä pakkaus tai etiketti, S62
fr: En cas d'ingestion\, ne pas faire vomir. Consulter immédiatement un médecin et lui montrer l'emballage ou l'étiquette, S62
it: In caso di ingestione non provocare il vomito: consultare immediatamente il medico e mostrargli il contenitori o l'etichetta, S62
lt: Prarijus\, neskatinti vėmimo\, nedelsiant kreiptis į gydytoją ir parodyti jam šią pakuotę arba etiketę, S62
lv: Ja norīts\, neizraisīt vemšanu\, nekavējoties meklēt medicīnisko palīdzību un uzrādīt iepakojumu vai tā mark¸ ējumu, S62
mt: Jekk jinbela'\, tippruvax tikkaġuna l-vomitu; mur għand tabib u uri dan il-kontenitur jew it- tikketta, S62
nl: Bij inslikken niet het braken opwekken; direct een arts raadplegen en de verpakking of het etiket tonen, S62
no: Ved svelging må det ikke fremtvinges brekninger\, men kontakt lege omgående og vis emballasjen eller etiketten, S62
pl: W razie połknięcia nie wywoływać wymiotów\, niezwłocznie zasięgnąć porady lekarza i pokazać opakowanie lub etykietę, S62
pt: Em caso de ingestão\, não provocar o vómito. Consultar imediatamente um médico e mostrar-lhe a embalagem ou o rótulo, S62
sk: Pri požití nevyvolávat’ zvracanie; okamžite vyhl’adajte lekársku pomoc a ukážte tento obal alebo označenie, S62
sl: Po zaužitju ne izzivati bruhanja: takoj poiskati zdravniško pomoč in pokazati embalažo ali etiketo, S62
sv: Vid förtäring\, framkalla ej kräkning. Kontakta genast läkare och visa  denna förpackning eller etiketten, S62

en: In case of accident by inhalation: remove casualty to fresh air and keep at rest, S63
cs: V případě nehody při vdechnutí přeneste postiženého na čerstvý vzduch a ponechte jej v klidu, S63
de: Bei Unfall durch Einatmen: Verunfallten an die frische Luft bringen und ruhigstellen, S63
dk: Ved ulykkestilfælde ved indånding bringes tilskadekomne ud i frisk luft og holdes i ro, S63
el: Σε περίπτωση ατυχήµατος λόγω εισπονής: αποµακρύνετε το θύµα από το µολυσµένο χώρο και αφήστε το να ηρεµήσει, S63
es: En caso de accidente por inhalación\, alejar a la víctima de la zonaco ntaminada y mantenerla en reposo, S63
fi: Jos ainetta on onnettomuuden sattussa hengitetty: siirrä henkilö raittiiseen ilmaan ja pidä hänet levossa, S63
fr: En cas d'accident par inhalation\, transporter la victime hors de la zone contaminée et la garder au respos, S63
hu: Belégzés miatt bekövetkező baleset esetén a sérültet friss levego ½re kell vinni és biztosítani kell számára a nyugalmat, S63
it: In caso di incidente per inalazione\, allontanare l'infortunato dalla zona contaminata e mantenerlo a riposo, S63
lt: Įkvėpusį ir dėl to blogai pasijutusį nukentėjusi įjį išvesti į gryną orą ir jo netrikdyti, S63
lv: Ja ieelpots\, pārvietot cietušo svaigā gaisā un noguldīt, S63
mt: F'każ ta' inċident ikkaġunat mix-xamm: ħu l-pazjent fl-arja friska u qiegħdu jistrieħ, S63
nl: Bij een ongeval door inademing: slachtoffer in de frisse lucht brengen en laten rusten, S63
no: Ved uhell ved innånding\, bring den forulykkede ut i frisk luft og hold ham rolig, S63
pl: W przypadku zatrucia drogą oddechową wyprowadzić lub wynieść poszkodowanego na świeże powietrze i zapewnić warunki do odpoczynku, S63
pt: Em caso de inalação acidental\, remover a vítima da zona contaminada e mantê-la em repouso, S63
sk: Pri úraze spôsobenom vdýchnutím látky postihnutého vyved’te na čerstvý vzduch a zabezpečte mu kl’ud, S63
sl: V primeru nezgode pri vdihavanju: prizadeto osebo umakniti na svež zrak in pustiti počivati, S63
sv: Vid olycksfall via inanding\, flytta den drabbade till frisk luft och låt vila, S63

en: If swallowed\, rinse mouth with water (only if the person is conscious), S64
cs: Při požití vypláchněte ústa velkým množstvím vody (pouze je-li postižený při vědomí), S64
de: Bei Verschlucken Mund mit Wasser ausspülen (nur wenn Verunfallter bei Bewusstsein ist), S64
dk: Ved indtagelse\, skyl munden med vand (kun hvis personen er ved bevidsthed), S64
el: Σε περίπτωση κατάποσης\, ξεπλύνετε το στόµα µε νερό (µόνο εφό- σον το θύµα διατηρεί τις αισθήσεις του), S64
es: En caso de ingestión\, enjuáguese la boca con agua (solamente si la persona está consciente), S64
et: Allaneelamisel loputada suud veega (ainult juhul\, kui isik on teadvusel), S64
fi: Jos ainetta on nielty\, huuhtele suu vedellä (vain jos henkilö on tajuissaan), S64
fr: En cas d'ingestion\, rincer la bouche avec l'eau (seulement si la personne est consciente), S64
hu: Lenyelés esetén a szájat vízzel ki kell öblíteni (csak abban az esetben ha a sérült nem eszméletlen), S64
it: In caso di ingestione\, sciacquare la bocca con acqua (solamente se l'infortunato è cosciente), S64
lt: Prarijus\, praskalauti burną vandeniu (jei nukentėjusysis turi sąmonę), S64
lv: Ja norīts\, izskalot muti ar ūdeni (ja cietušais ir pie samanas), S64
mt: Jekk jinbela'\, laħlaħil-ħalq bl-ilma (iżda biss jekk il-persuna tkun f'sensiha), S64
nl: Bij inslikken\, mond met water spoelen (alleen als de persoon bij bewustzijn is), S64
no: Ved svelging skyll munnen med vann (bare hvis den forulykkede er ved bevissthet), S64
pl: W przypadku połknięcia wypłukać usta wodą – nigdy nie stosować u osób nieprzytomnych, S64
pt: Em caso de ingestão\, lavar repetidamente a boca com água (apenas se a vítima estiver consciente), S64
sk: Pri požití vypláchnite ústa vodou (iba ak je postihnutý pri vedomí), S64
sl: Pri zaužitju spirati usta z vodo (samo če je oseba pri zavesti), S64
sv: Vid förtäring\, skölj munnen med vatten (endast om personen är vid medvetande), S64

en: Keep container tightly closed, S7
cs: Uchovávejte obal těsně uzavřený , S7
de: Behälter dicht geschlossen halten, S7
dk: Emballagen skal holdes tæt lukket, S7
el: Το δοχείο να διατηρείται ερµητικά κλεισµένο, S7
es: Manténgase el recipiente bien cerrado, S7
et: Hoida pakend tihedalt suletuna, S7
fi: Säilytettävä tiiviisti suljettuna, S7
fr: Conserver le récipient bien fermé, S7
hu: Az edényzet légmentesen lezárva tartandó, S7
it: Conservare il recipiente ben chiuso, S7
lt: Pakuotę laikyti sandariai uždarytą, S7
lv: Uzglabāt cieši noslēgtu, S7
mt: Żomm il-kontenitur magħluq sewwa, S7
nl: In goed gesloten verpakking bewaren, S7
no: Emballasjen skal holdes tett lukket, S7
pl: Przechowywać pojemnik szczelnie zamknięty, S7
pt: Manter o recipiente bem fechado, S7
sk: Uchovávajte nádobu tesne uzavretú, S7
sl: Hraniti v tesno zaprti posodi, S7
sv: Förpackningen förvaras väl tillsluten, S7

en: Keep container tightly closed and at a temperature not exceeding …°C (to be specified by the manufacturer), S7/47
de: Behälter dicht geschlossen und nicht bei Temperaturen über …°C aufbewahren (vom Hersteller anzugeben), S7/47
dk: Emballagen skal holdes tæt lukket og opbevares ved temperaturer på ikke over …°C (angives af fabrikanten), S7/47
es: Manténgase el recipiente bien cerrado y consérvese a una temperatura no superior a …°C (a especificar por el fabricante), S7/47
fi: Säilytettävä tiiviisti suljettuna ja alle… °C:n lämpötilassa (valmistaja/maahantuoja ilmoittaa lampötilan), S7/47
fr: Conserver le récipient bien fermé et à une température ne dépassant pas …°C (à préciser par le fabricant), S7/47
it: Tenere il recipiente ben chiuso e a temperatura non superiore a …°C (da precisare da parte del fabbricante), S7/47
nl: Gesloten verpakking bewaren bij een temperatuur beneden …°C (aan te geven door de fabrikant), S7/47
no: Emballasjen skal holdes tett lukket\, må ikke oppbevares ved en temperatur som er høyere enn …°C (angis av produsent eller importør), S7/47
pt: Manter o recipiente bem fechado e conservar a uma temperatura que não exceda …°C (a especificar pelo produtor), S7/47
sv: Förpackningen förvaras väl tillsluten vid en temperatur som inte överstiger …°C (anges av tillverkaren), S7/47

en: Keep container tightly closed and dry, S7/8
cs: Uchovávejte obal těsně uzavřený a suchý , S7/8
de: Behälter trocken und dicht geschlossen halten, S7/8
dk: Emballagen skal holdes tæt lukket og opbevares tørt, S7/8
el: Το δοχείο να διατηρείται ερµητικά κλεισµένο και να προστατεύεται από την υγρασία, S7/8
es: Manténgase el recipiente bien cerrado y en lugar seco, S7/8
et: Hoida pakend tihedalt suletuna ja kuivana, S7/8
fi: Säilytettävä kuivana ja tiiviisti suljettuna, S7/8
fr: Conserver le récipient bien fermé et à l'abri de l'humidité, S7/8
hu: Az edényzet légmentesen lezárva\, szárazon tartandó, S7/8
it: Conservare il recipiente ben chiuso e al riparo dall'umidità, S7/8
lt: Pakuotę laikyti sandariai uždarytą ir sausoje vietoje, S7/8
lv: Uzglabāt sausu un cieši noslēgtu, S7/8
mt: Żomm il-kontenitur magħluq tajjeb u xott, S7/8
nl: Droog houden en in een goed gesloten verpakking bewaren, S7/8
no: Emballasjen skal holdes tett lukket og oppbevares på et tørt sted, S7/8
pl: Przechowywać pojemnik szczelnie zamknięty w suchym pomieszczeniu, S7/8
pt: Conservar o recipiente bem fechado e ao abrigo da humidade, S7/8
sk: Uchovávajte nádobu tesne uzavretú a suchú, S7/8
sl: Hraniti v tesno zaprti posodi na suhem, S7/8
sv: Förpackningen förvaras väl tillsluten och torrt, S7/8

en: Keep container tightly closed and in a well-ventilated place, S7/9
cs: Uchovávejte obal těsně uzavřený \, na dobře větraném místě, S7/9
de: Behälter dicht geschlossen an einem gut gelüfteten Ort aufbewahren, S7/9
dk: Emballagen skal holdes tæt lukket og opbevares på et godt ventileret sted, S7/9
el: Το δοχείο να διατηρείται ερµητικά κλεισµένο και σε καλά αεριζό- µενο µέρος, S7/9
es: Manténgase el recipiente bien cerrado y en lugar bien ventilado, S7/9
et: Hoida pakend tihedalt suletuna hästi ventileeritavas kohas, S7/9
fi: Säilytettävä tiiviisti suljettuna paikassa\, jossa on hyvä ilmanvaihto, S7/9
fr: Conserver le récipient bien fermé et dans un endroit bien ventilé, S7/9
hu: Az edényzet légmentesen lezárva és jól szellőztetett helyen tartandó, S7/9
it: Tenere il recipiente ben chiuso e in luogo ben ventilato, S7/9
lt: Pakuotę laikyti sandariai uždarytą\, gerai vėdinamoje vietoje, S7/9
lv: Uzglabāt cieši noslēgtu labi vēdināmā vietā, S7/9
mt: Żomm il-kontenitur magħluq tajjeb u f'post ivventilat tajjeb, S7/9
nl: Gesloten verpakking op een goed geventileerde plaats bewaren, S7/9
no: Emballasjen skal holdes tett lukket og oppbevares på et godt ventilert sted, S7/9
pl: Przechowywać pojemnik szczelnie zamknięty w miejscu dobrze wentylowanym, S7/9
pt: Manter o recipiente bem fechado em local bem ventilado, S7/9
sk: Uchovávajte nádobu tesne uzavretú a na dobre vetranom mieste, S7/9
sl: Hraniti v tesno zaprti posodi ne dobro prezračevanem mestu, S7/9
sv: Förpackningen förvaras väl tillsluten på väl ventilared plats, S7/9

en: Keep container dry, S8
cs: Uchovávejte obal suchý , S8
de: Behälter trocken halten, S8
dk: Emballagen skal opbevares tørt, S8
el: Το δοχείο να προστατεύεται από την υγρασία, S8
es: Manténgase el recipiente en lugar seco, S8
et: Hoida pakend kuivana, S8
fi: Säilytettävä kuivana, S8
fr: Conserver le récipient à l'abri de l'humidité, S8
hu: Az edényzet szárazon tartandó, S8
it: Conservare al riparo dall'umidità, S8
lt: laikyti sausoje vietoje, S8
lv: Uzglabāt sausu, S8
mt: Żomm il-kontenitur niexef, S8
nl: Verpakking droog houden, S8
no: Oppbevares tørt, S8
pl: Przechowywać pojemnik w suchym pomieszczeniu, S8
pt: Manter o recipiente ao abrigo da humidade, S8
sk: Uchovávajte nádobu suchú, S8
sl: Posodo hraniti na suhem, S8
sv: Förpackningen förvaras torrt, S8

en: Keep container in a well-ventilated place, S9
cs: Uchovávejte obal na dobře větraném místě, S9
de: Behälter an einem gut gelüfteten Ort aufbewahren, S9
dk: Emballagen skal opbevares på et godt ventileret sted, S9
el: Το δοχείο να διατηρείται σε καλά αεριζόµενο µέρος, S9
es: Consérvese el recipiente en lugar bien ventilado, S9
et: Hoida pakend hästi ventileeritavas kohas, S9
fi: Säilytettävä paikassa\, jossa on hyvä ilmanvaihto, S9
fr: Conserver le récipient dans un endroit bien ventilé, S9
hu: Az edényzet jól szellőztetett helyen tartandó, S9
it: Conservare il recipiente in luogo ben ventilato, S9
lt: Pakuotę laikyti gerai vėdinamoje vietoje, S9
lv: Uzglabāt labi vēdināmā vietā, S9
mt: Żomm il-kontenitur f'post ivventilat sewwa, S9
nl: Op een goed geventileerde plaats bewaren, S9
no: Oppbevares på et godt ventilert sted, S9
pl: Przechowywać pojemnik w miejscu dobrze wentylowanym, S9
pt: Manter o recipiente num local bem ventilado, S9
sk: Uchovávajte nádobu na dobre vetranom mieste, S9
sl: Posodo hraniti na dobro prezračevanem mestu, S9
sv: Förpackningen förvaras på väl venilerad plats, S9

en: Do not empty into drains; dispose of this material and its container at hazardous or special waste collection point, S29/56
cs: Nevylévejte do kanalizace\, zneškodněte tento materiál a jeho obal ve sběrném místě pro zvláštní nebo nebezpečné odpady, S29/56
de: Nicht in die Kanalisation gelangen lassen; dieses Produkt und seinen Behälter der Problemabfallentsorgung zuführen, S29/56
dk: Må ikke tømmes i kloakafløb\, aflever dette materiale og dets beholder til et indsamlingssted for farligt affald og problemaffald, S29/56
el: Μην αδειάζετε το υπόλοιπο του περιεχοµένου στην αποχέτευση. Το υλικό αυτό και ο περιέκτης του να εναποτεθούν σε δηµόσιο χώρο συλλογής επικινδύνων ή ειδικών αποβλήτων, S29/56
es: No tirar los residuos por el desagüe; elimínese está sustancia y su recipiente en un punto de recogida pública de residuos especiales o peligrosos, S29/56
et: Mitte valada kanalisatsiooni. Kemikaal ja tema pakend tuleb viia ohtlike jäätmete kogumispunkti, S29/56
fi: Ei saa tyhjentää viemäriin; tämä aine ja sen pakkaus on toimitettava ongelmajätteen vastaanottopaikkaan, S29/56
fr: Ne pas jeter les résidus à l'égout\, éliminer ce produit et son récipient dans un centre de collecte des déchets dangereux ou spéciaux, S29/56
hu: Csatornába engedni nem szabad\, az anyagot és edényzetét különleges hulladék- vagy veszélyeshulladék-gyűjtő helyre kell vinni, S29/56
it: Non gettare i residui nelle fognature; smaltire questo materiale e i relativi contenitori in un punto di raccolta di rifiuti pericolosi o speciali, S29/56
lt: Neišleisti į kanalizaciją\, šios medžiagos atliekas ir jos pakuotę išvežti į pavojingų atliekų surinkimo vietas, S29/56
lv: Vielu vai produktu aizliegts izliet kanalizācijā\, vielu\, produktu vai iepakojumu likvidē bīstamo atkritumu savākšanas vietā vai īpašā atkritumu savākšanas vietā, S29/56
mt: Tarmix fid- drenaġġ: armi l-materjal u l-kontenitur tiegħu f'post fejn jinġabar skart perikoluż jew speċjali, S29/56
nl: Afval niet in de gootsteen werpen; deze stof en de verpakking naar een inzamelpunt voor gevaarlijk of bijzonder afval brengen, S29/56
no: Må ikke tømmes i kloakkavløp\, skal ikke slippes ut i avløp eller til miljøet\, men leveres til godkjent avfallsbehandlingsanlegg, S29/56
pl: Nie wprowadzać do kanalizacji\, a zużyty produkt i opakowanie dostarczyć na składowisko odpadów niebezpiecznych, S29/56
pt: Não deitar os resíduos no esgoto\, eliminar este produto e o seu recipiente\, enviando-os para local autorizado para a recolha de resíduos perigosos ou especiais, S29/56
sk: Nevyprázdňujte do kanalizácie\, zneškodnite tento materiál a jeho obal v mieste zberu nebezpečného alebo špeciálneho odpadu, S29/56
sl: Ne izprazniti v kanalizacijo – snov/pripravek in embalažo predati odstranjevalcu nevarnih ali posebnih odpadkov, S29/56
sv: Töm ej i avloppet\, lämna detta material och dess behållare till insamlingsställe för farligt avfall, S29/56